Tennessee, session 114, HB0576.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-11-151, is amended by adding
the following as the last sentence of the first paragraph in the section, after "The notice may be
printed on the face, back or as a separate attachment to the bond.":
The notice may contain different sized fonts and colors so that the substance of
the notice is conspicuous and easy to read.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0576
001365
- 1 -